Arkansas, session 2025, HB1666.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 21-2-803 is amended to read as follows:
21-2-803. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “County” means any county of this state;
(2) “Cyber response contact” means a person or entity designated
by the Arkansas Cyber Response Board to be the initial contact for a
participating governmental entity that is the subject of a cyberattack;
(3)(A) “Cyber response panel” means a group of entities, each of
which has been procured through state procurement and approved by the board,
which can be activated by the cyber response contact to assist the
participating governmental entity with forensic analysis, restoration
guidance, and other board-authorized assistance following a cyberattack.
(B) “Cyber response panel” may include an entity that is
owned or managed by the government;
(4) “Higher education entity” means a:
(A) State-supported college, university, technical
college, community college, or other institution of higher education; or
*LGL101*
04-08-2025 10:50:55 LGL101

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 HB1666
(B) Department, division, or agency of a state institution
of higher education;
(5)(4) “Money” means:
(A) Currency, coins, and bank notes in current use and
having a face value; and
(B) Travelers' checks, register checks, and money orders
held for sale to the general public;
(6)(5) “Municipality” means:
(A) A city of the first class;
(B) A city of the second class; or
(C) An incorporated town;
(7)(6) “Participating governmental entity” means a:
(A) County;
(B) Municipality; or
(C) School district;
(8)(7) “Property other than money and securities” means any
tangible property, other than money and securities, that has intrinsic value;
and
(9)(8) “School district” means a school district or open-
enrollment public charter school in this state.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 21-2-804(a), concerning the establishment
of the Arkansas Self-Funded Cyber Response Program, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(4) The program shall be:
(A) Secondary to any insurance a participating
governmental entity may have; and
(B) Used to reimburse a participating governmental entity
for losses as detailed in this subchapter.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 21-2-804(e), concerning the scope of
coverage of the Arkansas Self-Funded Cyber Response Program, is repealed.
(e) A participating governmental entity is legally liable for damages
as a result of:
(1) The deprivation or violation of a civil right of an
individual by a public official or public employee; or
04-08-2025 10:50:55 LGL101

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 HB1666
(2) The tortious conduct of a public official or public employee.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 21-2-805(a)(2), concerning the Arkansas
Cyber Response Board, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The member under subdivision (a)(1)(F) (a)(1)(E) of this
section shall be a nonvoting board member.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 21-2-805(b), concerning the Arkansas Cyber
Response Board, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The board shall:
(1)(A) Establish a definition of a cyberattack that will be
covered under the Arkansas Self-Funded Cyber Response Program based on
industry standards.
(B) The definition of a cyberattack established under
subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall be reviewed annually and updated
as necessary by the board;
(2) Establish minimum cybersecurity standards for participating
governmental entities;
(3) Determine a maximum amount of program coverage, not to exceed
fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), for participating governmental entities
that have not met the minimum cybersecurity standards established by the
board under this section;
(4) Create a cyber response panel;
(5)(A)(4)(A) Designate a cyber response contact.
(B) The cyber response contact may select an entity from the
cyber response panel to assist with forensic analysis, restoration guidance,
and other board-authorized assistance to the participating governmental
entity.
(C) The cyber response contact shall provide to the board:
(i) Prompt notice detailing the cyberattack; and
(ii) A detailed report of the action that is being
taken; and
(6)(5) Promulgate rules and procedures regarding utilization of
the program by participating governmental entities to generally align with
the following procedures:
(A) Upon discovery of a cyberattack, a participating
04-08-2025 10:50:55 LGL101

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 HB1666
governmental entity shall notify the cyber response contact designated by the
board;
(B)(i) The cyber response contact shall make a determination
of program coverage in consultation with the board, if feasible.
(ii) If consultation with the board is not feasible
under subdivision (b)(6)(B)(i) (b)(5)(B)(i) of this section due to the timing
of the cyberattack, then the cyber response contact shall review and evaluate
criteria established by the board to make a determination of program
coverage.;
(C) The cyber response contact shall notify the board once
the cyber response contact has made a determination of program coverage; and
(D) Any other procedures that the board deems necessary to
carry out this subchapter.

/s/S. Meeks





















04-08-2025 10:50:55 LGL101